Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2210
Commission; retirement of bonds; powers.

The commission, subject to such agreements with bondholders as may then prevail, shall have the power out of any money available therefor to purchase the bonds for retirement.

Laws 1969, c. 309, § 10, p. 1110.